Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-169
Rules and regulations; authority of materiel division.

The materiel division under the direction of the Director of Administrative Services may make such reasonable rules and regulations as may be deemed necessary for the administration of sections 81-164 to 81-171.

Laws 1943, c. 218, § 6, p. 716;

R.S.1943, § 81-169.